Hawaii statutes.
[§344-1] Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to establish a state policy which will encourage productive and
enjoyable harmony between people and their environment, promote efforts which
will prevent or eliminate damage to the environment and biosphere and stimulate
the health and welfare of humanity, and enrich the understanding of the
ecological systems and natural resources important to the people of Hawaii. [L
1974, c 247, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next